Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
24-4-302. County employees included — Exceptions.

All counties in this state shall be subject to the provisions of this act as participating public employers, and all counties shall, from and after July 30, 1959, include their employees, as defined in § 24-4-101(14), (17), and (27), in the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, except as follows:

Any newly constructed county-owned and operated hospital which was first placed in use after December 1, 1975, may elect, by at least a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its governing body, to exclude the employees of the hospital from membership in the system, but only if the election was certified to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System prior to July 1, 1976. However, any hospital electing to exclude its employees from membership under the provisions of this subdivision (1) shall require its employees to become members of the system effective July 1, 1978;

A hospital which is owned but not operated by a county and which, subsequent to June 30, 1963, becomes operated by a county, may elect, by at least a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its governing body, to exclude its employees of the hospital from membership in the system, but only if the election is certified to the board within a period of one (1) year from and after the date the hospital becomes operated by a county;

In the event the governing body of a county-owned and operated hospital elects to exclude its employees from membership in the system, the employees of the hospital shall thereupon cease to be members of the system.

Any balances standing to the credit of the members in the members' deposit account shall be returned to the members.

If any hospital elects, after February 1, 1971, and prior to July 1, 1972, to exclude its members from the system, the contributions made to the system by or on behalf of the hospital that are in excess of the amounts determined by actuarial calculations to be necessary to fund the outstanding obligations of the system to employees of the withdrawing hospital shall be returned to the withdrawing hospital;

A hospital which, as of June 30, 1988, is owned and operated by a county and which has failed to participate in the system may elect to exclude the employees of the hospital from membership in the system by at least a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its governing body.

Neither employees of the hospital nor the hospital itself shall be liable or eligible to pay any past contribution which may have been due the system, but only if the election is certified to the board prior to July 1, 1990; and

A nursing home, assisted living facility, or healthcare facility that is:

Owned but not operated by a county may elect by a vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of its governing body to exclude employees of the facility from membership in the system but only if the election is certified to the board within one (1) year from March 25, 2011; and

Constructed or acquired by a county after March 25, 2011, but not operated by a county may elect by a vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of its governing body to exclude employees of the facility from membership in the system but only if the election is certified to the board within one (1) year from the date of the beginning of operations after construction or acquisition.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 6; 1959, No. 42, § 6; 1961, No. 64, § 3; 1963, No. 56, § 1; 1969, No. 476, § 1; 1971, No. 303, § 1; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1187, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2506; reen. Acts 1987, No. 998, § 1; 1989, No. 50, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 17; 2011, No. 737, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 998, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (5).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1957, No. 177, codified as §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-105, 24-4-201, 24-4-202, 24-4-205, 24-4-207 — 24-4-209, 24-4-301 — 24-4-304, 24-4-401, 24-4-402, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510 — 24-4-512, 24-4-513 [repealed], 24-4-601 — 24-4-603, 24-4-605, 24-4-606.

24-4-303. Membership — Election by municipalities — Leased water and sewer utilities.

Any municipality may elect to become a participating public employer and to cover its employees under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System either by a three-fifths (3/5) vote of its governing body or by a majority vote of the qualified voters of the municipality.

However, the mayor and city clerk of a city of the first class who are serving in a municipality that participates in the system shall become participating employees under the system upon taking office.

If the employee elects not to continue participation in the system and opts to participate in the local retirement plan as provided under § 24-12-121 or § 24-12-123, instead, written notice of the election shall be presented to the system in a form determined acceptable by the system not later than ninety (90) calendar days after first assuming office.

The election under subdivision (a)(1)(C)(i) of this section is irrevocable.

Employer contributions made to the system on behalf of employees who elect not to continue participation will be refunded to the city without interest, and the associated service credit in the system is forfeited.

If a newly elected city attorney or city treasurer of a city of the first class is otherwise covered under a local retirement fund, then the provisions of subdivisions (a)(1)(B) and (C) of this section also apply to those offices.

The clerk or recorder of each municipality electing to become a participating public employer shall certify the vote to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System within ten (10) days after the vote of the governing body or the canvass of the votes of the electorate, as the case may be.

The effective date of coverage under the system shall be either the first day of the calendar month next following receipt by the board of the election results or the July 1 next following the receipt, as determined by the vote.

If a municipal employee or a former municipal employee covered by the system in a municipality with a city administration of justice fund created under § 16-10-308 that exists to provide a pension fund for the position held by the employee or former employee elects to establish participation in the public retirement system under § 24-12-101 et seq., and to waive any rights the employee or former employee may have had, or would otherwise have, in the local retirement system, then:

The employee or former employee may transfer his or her service credit to the system; and

The municipality for which he or she is or was serving in the capacity as a district judge, may use the funds within the city's administration of justice fund to pay all contributions and interest required by the system to transfer the service credit to the system.

In addition, if any employee or former employee covered by the city's administration of justice fund has transferred or does transfer service credit to the system anytime after January 1, 2000, and if the municipality has used general revenue funds to pay the contribution required to fund the transfer, or if the municipality has used the city's administration of justice fund to fund the transfer, then the city's administration of justice fund shall not be refunded. However, if general funds were used, the city may reimburse the general fund from the city's administration of justice fund for the contribution paid on behalf of the employee or former employee.

In addition to paying for the transfer of service credit for the position for which the fund is created, the municipality may also pay from the city's administration of justice fund on behalf of the employee or former employee for any additional transfer of service credit the employee or former employee elects to make regarding time as city attorney for the municipality.

The municipality may reimburse itself for any payment from the city's administration of justice fund to fund the transfer made from its general fund after January 1, 2000, on behalf of the employee or former employee to purchase city attorney service credit in the system.

If any payment for the service has been made directly from the city's administration of justice fund after January 1, 2000, the municipality shall not be required to reimburse the city's administration of justice fund for those transfers.

If a transfer from the general fund is made to the city's administration of justice fund after payment from the city's administration of justice fund for the service credit transfers and before the effective date of this subdivision (a)(5), the municipality is entitled to reimburse the general fund from the city's administration of justice fund for the amount of the transfers.

Any municipality which has as of March 28, 1981, taken its first vote to withdraw from participation shall be eligible to withdraw under the provisions of this section if the final vote to withdraw is certified to the board before July 1, 1981.

The effective date of withdrawal must be before January 1, 1982.

When the water and sewer department of a municipal participating public employer in a city of the first class becomes leased from the municipality and operated by a nonprofit corporation, the mayor shall notify the board in writing within ten (10) days after the utility ceases to be operated by the municipality and may request a refund of the employer contributions paid to the system by the municipality on behalf of the utility employees during their period of employment with the utility.

As soon as practicable after notification and request, the board shall arrange for a determination by its actuary or investment counselor of the lump sum present value of future system benefits for retirants, beneficiaries, and inactive members entitled to a deferred annuity from the employment with the utility while it was operated by the municipality.

The refund requested shall be subject to the following:

If the present value is more than the present system assets arising from the municipality's applicable contributions, then the difference determined by the system's actuary shall be paid to the system by the municipality, either in a single sum or in a series of actuarially equivalent payments over a period not to exceed ten (10) years.

The payment method shall be elected by the municipality from reasonable optional payment methods to be offered by the board;

If the present value is less than the present system assets arising from the municipality's applicable contributions, then the difference determined by the system's actuary shall be paid by the system to the municipality, either in a single sum or in a series of actuarially equivalent payments over a period not to exceed ten (10) years as the board shall determine;

The board shall withhold twenty percent (20%) from the municipality's applicable employer contributions and shall maintain that amount in the employer accumulation account for noncontributory utility employees who may reenter the system and have their forfeited utility service restored to their credit; and

From and after the date the utility ceased to be operated by the municipality:

The system shall have no further obligation for payment of benefits for the municipality's employees, which benefits would be based on service with the utility, except for any refund of contributions due a former member from the members' deposit account; and

The system shall retain the obligation for payment of benefits for the retirant and beneficiaries and inactive members entitled to a deferred annuity from employment with the utility while it was operated by the municipality, except that the retained obligation shall be reduced by any payment overdue or not paid to the system by the municipality for service of its utility employees before the municipality ceased operating the utility.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 6; 1961, No. 64, § 3; 1971, No. 228, § 1; 1973, No. 586, § 2; 1981, No. 882, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2506; Acts 1987, No. 376, § 1; 2003, No. 1281, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, subsection (c) began:

“From and after April 1, 1985.”

24-4-304. Credited service — Cessation of employment — Reemployment.

When a member is no longer employed in a position covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, he or she shall thereupon cease to be a member.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, upon termination of his or her membership, a member's credited service is forfeited.

If the person is not a retirant and becomes reemployed in a position covered by the system, the person shall become a member of the system, and the person's credited service which did not require member contributions and then was forfeited by him or her at termination of covered employment shall be restored to his or her credit.

Upon a member's retirement, he or she shall cease to be a member.

Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, he or she shall not again become a member.

Should a former member entitled to a deferred annuity provided for in § 24-4-510 become employed in a position covered by the system before becoming a retirant, the member shall thereupon cease to be entitled to a deferred annuity and shall become a member with his or her last credited service reinstated.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 7; 1959, No. 42, § 7; 1971, No. 190, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2507; Acts 1989, No. 160, § 2; 1993, No. 1104, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 18.

24-4-305. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning restoration to system of persons transferred to noncovered agencies, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1959, No. 264, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2519 — 12-2521.

Subchapter 4
— Employer and Employee Contributions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 17: Mar. 7, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of a State Employees Retirement System is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled state employees and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order that the Board of Trustees herein created be appointed, organize and establish the necessary rules and forms to be followed upon the establishment of the retirement system herein created on July 1, 1957. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 42, § 16: Feb. 13, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of county employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled county employees; that the coverage is best obtained by including the county employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that it is necessary for the Board of Trustees of said Arkansas State Employees Retirement System to organize and establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of county employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 64, § 9: Feb. 8, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of municipal employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled municipal employees; that the coverage is best obtained by permitting the inclusion of municipal employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System shall establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of municipal employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 153, § 15: Mar. 9, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “This act shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 632, § 7: May 27, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 185 of 1969 which provides for an increase in contributions to and benefits payable under the State Employees Retirement System to be effective on July 1, 1969 did not contain an emergency clause and therefore will not be effective until ninety (90) days after adjournment of the Regular Session; that due to the extension of the Regular Session as authorized in the Constitution, acts not having an emergency clause will not be effective until well after July 1; and that it is essential to the proper administration of the State Employees Retirement System that the increase in contributions to and benefits payable under the State Employees Retirement System take effect on July 1, 1969. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 103, § 8: Feb. 17, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to provide for an orderly retirement for public employees in Arkansas and for the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees Retirement System to have ample time for the implementation of the provisions of this act, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 666, § 14: Apr. 10, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act change the rate of contributions, change the value of service credits and establish new types of benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable persons to receive proper benefits thereunder without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 907, § 22: Apr. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this Act clarify coverage, service credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 299, § 28: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of law governing the Public Employees' Retirement System need clarification, standardization, and repeal and that the effective administration of State government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration of State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 5: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2011, No. 558, § 3: Effective on and after Jan. 1, 2012.

24-4-401. Contributions of members.

The members' deposit account shall be the account in which members' contributions shall be accumulated with interest as stipulated by § 24-4-209(a) and from which shall be made transfers and refunds of contributions or accumulated contributions as provided in this act.

Upon the retirement of a member, his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account shall be transferred to the retirement reserve account.

Until July 1, 2005, the contributions of a contributory member shall be six percent (6%) of the member's annual compensation.

Beginning July 1, 2005, the contribution rate shall be five percent (5%) of the member's annual compensation for a contributory member.

The member's deposit account shall be credited interest at a rate of four percent (4%) per annum beginning July 1, 2005.

The officer responsible for making up the payroll for each public employer shall cause the contributions provided for in this section to be deducted from the compensation of each member in the employ of a public employer.

The contributions shall be deducted on every payroll, for every payroll period, from the date of the member's entrance into the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to the date his or her membership terminates.

When deducted, each of the amounts shall be paid by the public employer to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund and shall be credited to the individual account in the members' deposit account of the member from whose compensation the contributions were deducted.

The contributions provided for in this section shall be made notwithstanding that the minimum salary or wages for any member shall be thereby changed.

Each member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for in this section.

Payment of a member's compensation less deductions shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for services rendered to a public employer by the member, except as to benefits provided by this act.

The official designated by the board of each participating public employer shall remit to the board the contributions deducted from the compensations of members in the employ of the employer.

The remittances shall be made in such manner and form, shall be made in such frequency, and shall from time to time be accompanied by such supporting data as the board shall prescribe.

It is expressly guaranteed that all members' contributions shall be held in trust for the exclusive benefit of the individual members and that no part of the funds shall ever be used for any other purpose.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 8; 1959, No. 42, § 8; 1965, No. 153, § 6; 1967, No. 108, § 2; 1969, No. 632, § 1; 1971, No. 103, § 2; 1973, No. 666, § 2; 1975, No. 907, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2508, 12-2508.1; Acts 1997, No. 299, § 13; 2001, No. 151, § 19; 2005, No. 2084, § 1.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1957, No. 177, codified as §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-105, 24-4-201, 24-4-202, 24-4-205, 24-4-207 — 24-4-209, 24-4-301 — 24-4-304, 24-4-401, 24-4-402, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510 — 24-4-512, 24-4-513 [repealed], 24-4-601 — 24-4-603, 24-4-605, 24-4-606.

24-4-402. Contributions of state and local government division employers — Accounts of retirement system.

The employers' accumulation account shall be the account in which shall be accumulated the contributions made by public employers to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Upon the retirement of a member, the difference between the member's annuity reserve and his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account shall be transferred from the employers' accumulation account to the retirement reserve account.

The state employer contributions shall be a set percentage rate of the compensations of state employees who are active members as well as those retired members who have returned to work under § 24-4-520. The rate of percentage shall be set by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as provided for by § 24-2-701.

The state's contributions, when paid into the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund, shall be credited to the employers' accumulation account.

The employer contributions to be paid by each participating public employer, other than the state, shall be a set percentage rate of the compensations of its employees who are active members as well as those retired members who have returned to work under § 24-4-520. The rate of percentage shall be set by the board as provided for by § 24-2-701.

The participating public employers' contributions, when paid into the fund, shall be credited to the employers' accumulation account.

The retirement reserve account shall be the account from which all annuities shall be paid as provided for in this act.

If a disability retirant returns to the employ of a public employer, the retirant's annuity reserve at that time shall be transferred from the retirement reserve account to the members' deposit account and the employers' accumulation account in the same proportion as the annuity reserve was originally transferred to the retirement reserve account.

The income account shall be the account to which shall be credited all interest, dividends, and other income from investments of the system, all gifts and bequests received by the system, and all other moneys, the disposition of which is not specifically provided for in this act.

There shall be paid or transferred from the income account all amounts required to credit regular interest to the various divisions of the members' deposit account, employers' accumulation account, and the retirement reserve account, as provided in this act.

Whenever the board determines that the balance in the income account is more than sufficient to cover current charges to the account, the excess may be transferred by the board to any of the other accounts of the system to cover special needs of the accounts.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 9; 1959, No. 42, § 9; 1961, No. 64, § 4; 1967, No. 175, § 1; 1969, No. 632, § 2; 1971, No. 103, § 3; 1973, No. 666, § 3; 1975, No. 907, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2509, 12-2509.1; Acts 1997, No. 299, § 14; 2001, No. 151, § 20; 2011, No. 558, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “active members as well as those retired members who have returned to work under § 24-4-520” for “members” in (b)(1) and (c)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-4-401.